dictsource/to_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Tongan

.replace
       ʼ       '     // replace modified apostrophe to simple apostrophe


.group a
   a       a

.group e
   e       e

.group f
   f       f

.group h
   h       h

.group i
   i       i

.group k
   k       k

.group l
   l       l

.group m
   m       m

.group n
   n       n
   ng      N

.group o
   o       o

.group p
   p       p

.group s
   s       s

.group t
   t       t

.group u
   u       u

.group v
   v       v

.group '
   '       ?


.group
   ā     a:
   ē     e:
   ī     i:
   ō     o:
   ū     u:
